District of Columbia statutes.
42-3114

Availability of other remedies.

The provisions of this chapter shall not limit the availability of other remedies under the law or other equitable relief whether or not an adequate remedy exists at law.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 15, 45 DCR 7982
1981 Ed., § 45-3314.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.
For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.